Nevada, session 83, SB505.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. 1. The Nevada Energy Resiliency Task Force is
hereby created. The Task Force consists of the following 11
members:
(a) Seven members appointed by the Governor, to include,
without limitation, at least one expert in each of the areas of energy,
logistics and economics;
(b) One member appointed by the Majority Leader of the
Senate;
-
*SB505*

– 2 –
(c) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Senate;
(d) One member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly; and
(e) One member appointed by the Minority Leader of the
Assembly.
2. The Task Force shall:
(a) Analyze the energy and fuel chain supply of the State and
identify any risks relating to dependency of the State on fuel refined
in California and the dwindling California fuel output, including,
without limitation, economic, health and security vulnerabilities as a
result of such dependency;
(b) Investigate options to reduce the dependency of the State on
fuel refined in California, including, without limitation, a pipeline
from the Permian Basin located in Texas and New Mexico,
expanding imports from refineries in Utah and alternative fuels; and
(c) Recommend strategies to develop and ensure energy
resilience in the State, including, without limitation,
recommendations relating to enhanced fuel storage, the
development of emergency energy protocols and regulatory reforms.
3. The members of the Task Force serve without
compensation.
4. Any member of the Task Force who is an officer or
employee of this State or a local government must be relieved from
his or her duties without loss of regular compensation to prepare for
and attend meetings of the Task Force and perform any work
necessary to carry out the duties of the Task Force in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or local government shall
not require an officer or employee who is a member of the Task
Force to make up the time the member is absent from work to carry
out his or her duties as a member, and shall not require the member
to take annual leave or compensatory time for the absence.
5. The Task Force shall, at its first meeting, elect a Chair and
Vice Chair from among its members.
6. The Task Force shall meet at the call of the Chair or a
majority of the members of the Task Force.
7. A majority of the members of the Task Force constitutes a
quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of those
members present at the meeting is sufficient for any official action
taken by the Task Force.
8. The Office of the Governor shall provide the Task Force
with such administrative support as is necessary to assist the Task
Force in carrying out its duties pursuant to this section.
9. The Task Force may apply for and accept any gift, donation,
bequest, grant or other source of money to carry out the work of the
Task Force.
-
*SB505*

– 3 –
10. The Task Force shall prepare and submit a written report to
the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
84th Session of the Legislature not later than February 1, 2027. The
report must include, without limitation, the findings and
recommendations of the Task Force.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding the provisions of NRS 218D.430 and
218D.435, a committee may vote on this act before the expiration of
the period for the return of a fiscal note in NRS 218D.475. This
applies retroactively from and after May 26, 2025.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB505*